Massachusetts, session 194th, H3013.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(dd) A taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit against the taxes imposed by this chapter for
the use of the commuter ferry as a primary source of transportation to work. To be eligible for a
credit under this subsection a taxpayer shall utilize a commuter ferry for transportation to work at
least 50 per cent of the days on which the taxpayer commutes to work. The amount of the tax
credit shall be $500.
of 1